California statutes. Penal Code
(3) A letter from the person licensed as an importer, manufacturer, or dealer pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code, with whom the consultant-evaluator has a bona fide business relationship. The letter shall detail the bona fide business purposes for which the firearm is being loaned and confirm that the consultant-evaluator is being loaned the firearm as part of a bona fide business relationship.

(4) The signature of the consultant-evaluator on a form indicating the date the firearm is loaned and the last day the firearm may be returned.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Exceptions Relating to Law Enforcement [27050. - 27065.]

27050.

(a) Article 1 (commencing with Section 26700) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 26800) do not apply to any sale, delivery, or transfer of firearms made to an authorized law enforcement representative of any city, county, city and county, or state, or of the federal government, for exclusive use by that governmental agency if, prior to the sale, delivery, or transfer of these firearms, written authorization from the head of the agency authorizing the transaction is presented to the person from whom the purchase, delivery, or transfer is being made.

(b) Proper written authorization is defined as verifiable written certification from the head of the agency by which the purchaser or transferee is employed, identifying the
 employee as an individual authorized to conduct the transaction, and authorizing the transaction for the exclusive use of the agency by which that person is employed.

(c) Within 10 days of the date a handgun, and commencing January 1, 2014, any firearm, is acquired by the agency, a record of the same shall be entered as an institutional weapon into the Automated Firearms System (AFS) via the California Law Enforcement Telecommunications System (CLETS) by the law enforcement or state agency. Any agency without access to AFS shall arrange with the sheriff of the county in which the agency is located to input this information via this system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 745, Sec. 18.   (AB 809)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

27055.

Article 1 (commencing with Section 26700) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 26800) do not apply to the loan of a firearm if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(a) The loan is made by an authorized law enforcement representative of a city, county, or city and county, or of the state or federal government.

(b) The loan is made to a peace officer employed by that agency and authorized to carry a firearm.

(c) The loan is made for the carrying and use of that firearm by that peace officer in the course and scope of the officer’s duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

27060.

(a) Article 1 (commencing with Section 26700) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 26800) do not apply to the sale, delivery, or transfer of a firearm by a law enforcement agency to a peace officer pursuant to Section 10334 of the Public Contract Code.

(b) Within 10 days of the date that a handgun, and commencing January 1, 2014, any firearm, is sold, delivered, or transferred pursuant to Section 10334 of the Public Contract Code to that peace officer, the name of the officer and the make, model, serial number, and other identifying characteristics of the firearm being sold, delivered, or transferred shall be entered into the Automated Firearms System (AFS) via the California Law Enforcement Telecommunications System
 (CLETS) by the law enforcement or state agency that sold, delivered, or transferred the firearm, provided, however, that if the firearm is not a handgun and does not have a serial number, identification number, or identification mark assigned to it, that fact shall be noted in AFS. Any agency without access to AFS shall arrange with the sheriff of the county in which the agency is located to input this information via this system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 745, Sec. 19.   (AB 809)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

27065.

(a) Article 1 (commencing with Section 26700) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 26800) do not apply to the sale, delivery, or transfer of a firearm by a law enforcement agency to a retiring peace officer who is authorized to carry a firearm pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 26300) of Division 5.

(b) Within 10 days of the date that a handgun, and commencing January 1, 2014, any firearm, is sold, delivered, or transferred to that retiring peace officer, the name of the officer and the make, model, serial number, and other identifying characteristics of the firearm being sold, delivered, or transferred shall be entered into the Automated Firearms System (AFS) via the California Law Enforcement
 Telecommunications System (CLETS) by the law enforcement or state agency that sold, delivered, or transferred the firearm, provided, however, that if the firearm is not a handgun and does not have a serial number, identification number, or identification mark assigned to it, that fact shall be noted in AFS. Any agency without access to AFS shall arrange with the sheriff of the county in which the agency is located to input this information via this system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 745, Sec. 20.   (AB 809)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Other Exceptions [27100. - 27140.]

27100.

Article 1 (commencing with Section 26700) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 26800) do not apply to sales, deliveries, or transfers of firearms between or to importers and manufacturers of firearms licensed to engage in that business pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and the regulations issued pursuant thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

27105.

Article 1 (commencing with Section 26700) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 26800) do not apply to the delivery of a firearm to a gunsmith for service or repair, or to the return of the firearm to its owner by the gunsmith, or to the delivery of a firearm by a gunsmith to a person licensed pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code for service or repair and the return of the firearm to the gunsmith.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

27115.

Article 1 (commencing with Section 26700) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 26800) do not apply to the sale, delivery, or transfer of unloaded firearms by a dealer to a person who resides outside this state and is licensed pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and the regulations issued pursuant thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

27120.

Article 1 (commencing with Section 26700) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 26800) do not apply to the sale, delivery, or transfer of unloaded firearms to a wholesaler if the firearms are being returned to the wholesaler and are intended as merchandise in the wholesaler’s business.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

27125.

Article 1 (commencing with Section 26700) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 26800) do not apply to the sale, delivery, or transfer of firearms if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(a) The firearms are unloaded.

(b) The sale, delivery, or transfer is made by one dealer to another dealer, upon proof of compliance with the requirements of Section 27555.

(c) The firearms are intended as merchandise in the receiving dealer’s business.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

27130.

Until January 1, 2014, Article 1 (commencing with Section 26700) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 26800) do not apply to the sale, delivery, or transfer of an unloaded firearm, other than a handgun, by a dealer to himself or herself.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 745, Sec. 22.   (AB 809)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

27135.

Article 1 (commencing with Section 26700) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 26800) do not apply to the loan of an unloaded firearm by a dealer who also operates a target facility that holds a business or regulatory license on the premises of the building designated in the license or whose building designated in the license is on the premises of any club or organization organized for the purposes of practicing shooting at targets upon established ranges, whether public or private, to a person at that target facility or that club or organization, if the firearm is at all times kept within the premises of the target range or on the premises of the club or organization.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

27140.

Article 1 (commencing with Section 26700) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 26800) do not apply to the sale, delivery, or transfer of a firearm regulated pursuant to any of the following statutes, if the sale, delivery, or transfer of that firearm is conducted in accordance with the applicable provisions of the statute:

(a) Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 18710) of Division 5 of Title 2, relating to destructive devices and explosives.

(b) Section 24410, relating to cane guns, and the exemptions in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Title 2, as they relate to cane guns.

(c) Section 24510, relating to firearms that are not immediately recognizable as firearms, and the exemptions in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Title 2, as they relate to firearms that are not immediately recognizable as firearms.

(d) Sections 24610 and 24680, relating to undetectable firearms, and the exemptions in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Title 2, as they relate to undetectable firearms.

(e) Section 24710, relating to wallet guns, and the exemptions in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Title 2, as they relate to wallet guns.

(f) Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 30500) of Division 10, relating to assault weapons.

(g) Section 31500, relating to unconventional pistols, and the exemptions in
 Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Title 2, as they relate to unconventional pistols.

(h) Sections 33215 to 33225, inclusive, relating to short-barreled rifles and short-barreled shotguns, and the exemptions in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Title 2, as they relate to short-barreled rifles and short-barreled shotguns.

(i) Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 32610) of Division 10, relating to machineguns.

(j) Section 33600, relating to zip guns, and the exemptions in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Title 2, as they relate to zip guns.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Gun Show or Event [27200. - 27415.]



  ARTICLE 1. Gun Show or Event [27200. - 27245.]

27200.

(a) No person shall produce, promote, sponsor, operate, or otherwise organize a gun show or event, as specified in subdivision (b) of Section 26805, unless that person possesses a valid certificate of eligibility from the Department of Justice.

(b) Unless the department’s records indicate that the applicant is a person prohibited from possessing firearms, a certificate of eligibility shall be issued by the Department of Justice to an applicant provided the applicant does all of the following:

(1) Certifies that the applicant is familiar with the provisions of this article and Article 2 (commencing with Section 27300).

(2) Ensures that liability insurance is in effect for the duration of an event or show in an amount of not less than one million dollars ($1,000,000).

(3) Provides an annual list of the gun shows or events that the applicant plans to promote, produce, sponsor, operate, or otherwise organize during the year for which the certificate of eligibility is issued, including the date, time, and location of the gun shows or events.

(c) If during that year the information required by paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) changes, or additional gun shows or events will be promoted, produced, sponsored, operated, or otherwise organized by the applicant, the producer shall notify the Department of Justice no later than 30 days prior to the gun show or event.

(d) The
 Department of Justice shall adopt regulations to administer the certificate of eligibility program under this section.

(e) The Department of Justice shall recover the full costs of administering the certificate of eligibility program by fees assessed applicants who apply for certificates. A licensed gun show producer shall be assessed an annual fee of eighty-five dollars ($85) by the department.

(f) It is the intent of the Legislature that the certificate of eligibility program established pursuant to this section be incorporated into the certificate of eligibility program established pursuant to Section 26710 to the maximum extent practicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

27205.

(a) Before commencement of a gun show or event, the producer thereof shall, upon written request from a law enforcement agency with jurisdiction over the facility, make available to that agency, within 48 hours or a later time specified by the agency, a complete and accurate list of all persons, entities, and organizations that have leased or rented, or are known to the producer to intend to lease or rent, any table, display space, or area at the gun show or event for the purpose of selling, leasing, or transferring firearms, or processing the sale or transfer of ammunition.

(b) The producer shall thereafter, upon written request, for every day the gun show or event operates, within 24
 hours or a later time specified by the requesting law enforcement agency, make available to that agency an accurate, complete, and current list of the persons, entities, and organizations that have leased or rented, or are known to the producer to intend to lease or rent, any table, display space, or area at the gun show or event for the purpose of selling, leasing, or transferring firearms, or processing the sale or transfer of ammunition.

(c) Subdivisions (a) and (b) apply to any person, entity, or organization, regardless of whether that person, entity, or organization participates in the entire gun show or event, or only a portion thereof.

(d) The information that may be requested by the law enforcement agency with jurisdiction over the facility, and that shall be
 provided by the producer upon request, includes, but is not limited to, the following information relative to a vendor who offers for sale any firearms manufactured after December 31, 1898, or any ammunition:

(1) The vendor’s complete name.

(2) A driver’s license or identification card number.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 736, Sec. 1.   (AB 1669)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

27210.

(a) The producer and facility’s manager of a gun show or event shall prepare an annual event and security plan and schedule that shall include, at a minimum, the following information for each show or event:

(1) The type of show or event, including, but not limited to, antique or general firearms and ammunition.

(2) The estimated number of vendors offering firearms or ammunition for sale or display.

(3) The estimated number of attendees.

(4) The number of entrances and exits at the gun show or event site.

(5) The location, dates, and times of the show or event.

(6) The contact person and telephone number for both the producer and the facility.

(7) The number of sworn peace officers employed by the producer or the facility’s manager who will be present at the show or event.

(8) The number of nonsworn security personnel employed by the producer or the facility’s manager who will be present at the show or event.

(b) The annual event and security plan shall be submitted by either the producer or the facility’s manager to the Department of Justice and the law enforcement agency with jurisdiction over the
 facility.

(c) If significant changes have been made since the annual plan was submitted, the producer shall, not later than 15 days before commencement of the gun show or event, submit to the department, the law enforcement agency with jurisdiction over the facility site, and the facility’s manager, a revised event and security plan, including a revised list of vendors that the producer knows, or reasonably should know, will be renting tables, space, or otherwise participating in the gun show or event.

(d) The event and security plan shall be approved by the facility’s manager before the event or show, after consultation with the law enforcement agency with jurisdiction over the facility.

(e) A gun show
 or event shall not commence unless the requirements of subdivisions (b), (c), and (d) are met.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 736, Sec. 2.   (AB 1669)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

27215.

The producer of a gun show or event shall be responsible for informing prospective gun show vendors of the requirements of this article and of Article 2 (commencing with Section 27300) that apply to vendors.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

27220.

(a) Within seven calendar days of the commencement of a gun show or event, but not later than noon on Friday for a show or event held on a weekend, the producer shall submit a list of all prospective vendors and designated firearms transfer agents who are licensed firearms dealers or ammunition vendors to the Department of Justice for the purpose of determining whether these prospective vendors and designated firearms transfer agents possess valid licenses and are thus eligible to participate as licensed dealers or ammunition vendors at the show or event.

(b) The department shall examine its records and if it determines that a dealer’s or vendor’s license is not valid, it shall notify the show
 or event producer of that fact before the show or event commences.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 736, Sec. 3.   (AB 1669)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

27225.

If a licensed firearms dealer or ammunition vendor fails to cooperate with a producer of a gun show or event, or fails to comply with the applicable requirements of this article or Article 2 (commencing with Section 27300), that person shall not be allowed to participate in that show or event.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 736, Sec. 4.   (AB 1669)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

27230.

If a producer fails to comply with Section 27215 or 27220, the gun show or event shall not commence until those requirements are met.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

27235.

Every producer of a gun show or event shall have a written contract with each gun show vendor selling firearms or ammunition at the show or event.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 736, Sec. 5.   (AB 1669)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

27240.

(a) The producer of a gun show or event shall require that signs be posted in a readily visible location at each public entrance to the show containing, but not limited to, the following notice:
“(1) This gun show follows all federal, state, and local firearms, ammunition, and weapons laws, without exception.

(2) Any firearm carried onto the premises by any member of the public will be checked, cleared of any ammunition, and secured in a manner that prevents it from being operated, and an identification tag or sticker will be attached to the firearm before the person is allowed admittance
 to the show.

(3) No member of the public under the age of 18 years shall be admitted to the show unless accompanied by a parent, grandparent, or legal guardian.

(4) All firearms transfers between private parties at the show shall be conducted through a licensed dealer in accordance with applicable state and federal laws.

(5) Persons possessing firearms of ammunition at this facility shall have in their immediate possession government-issued photo identification, and display it upon request to any security officer or any peace officer, as defined in Section 830.

(6) All ammunition transfers between private parties at the show shall be conducted through a
 licensed dealer or ammunition vendor in accordance with applicable state and federal laws.

(7) Firearms must be handled responsibly and securely stored to prevent access by children and other unauthorized users. California has strict laws pertaining to firearms, and you may be fined or imprisoned if you fail to comply with them. Visit the internet website of the California Attorney General at https://oag.ca.gov/firearms for information on firearm laws applicable to you and how you can comply.

(8) Children may be unable to distinguish firearms from toys and may operate firearms, causing severe injury or death. If you keep a firearm within any premises under your custody or control, and a person under 18 years of age gains access to the firearm and carries it off-premises, you may
 be guilty of a misdemeanor, unless you stored the firearm in a locked container, or locked the firearm with a locking device.

(9) You may be guilty of a misdemeanor, including a significant fine or imprisonment, if you keep a firearm where a minor is likely to access it or if a minor obtains and improperly uses it, or carries it off of the premises to a school or school-sponsored event, unless you stored the firearm in a locked container or locked the firearm with a locking device.

(10) If you negligently store or leave a firearm within any premises under your custody or control where a person under 18 years of age is likely to access it, you may be guilty of a misdemeanor, including a significant fine, unless you stored the firearm in a locked container or locked the firearm
 with a locking device.

(11) Discharging firearms in poorly ventilated areas, cleaning firearms, or handling ammunition may result in exposure to lead, a substance known to cause birth defects, reproductive harm, and other serious physical injury. Have adequate ventilation when discharging or cleaning firearms or handling ammunition. Wash hands thoroughly after exposure.

(12) Federal regulations provide that if you do not take physical possession of the firearm that you are acquiring ownership of within 30 days after you complete the initial background check paperwork, then you must complete the background check process a second time in order to take physical possession of that firearm.

(13) No person shall make an
 application to purchase more than one handgun or semiautomatic centerfire rifle within any 30-day period and no delivery shall be made to any person who has made an application to purchase more than one handgun or semiautomatic centerfire rifle within any 30-day period.

(14) If a firearm you own or possess is lost or stolen, you must report the loss or theft to a local law enforcement agency where the loss or theft occurred within five days of the time you knew or reasonably should have known that the firearm had been lost or stolen.”
(b) The show producer shall post, in a readily visible location at each entrance to the parking lot at the show, signage that states: “The transfer of firearms or ammunition on the parking lot of this facility
 is a crime.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 696, Sec. 1.   (AB 2552)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

27245.

(a) A willful failure by a gun show producer to comply with any of the requirements of this article, except for the posting of required signs, shall be a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed four thousand dollars ($4,000) and shall render the producer ineligible for a gun show producer license for two years from the date of the conviction.

(b) A willful failure of a gun show producer to post signs as required by this article shall be a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000) for the first offense and not to exceed four thousand dollars ($4,000) for the second or subsequent offense, and with respect to the second or subsequent offense,
 shall render the producer ineligible for a gun show producer license for two years from the date of the conviction.

(c) Multiple violations charged pursuant to subdivision (a) arising from more than one gun show or event shall be grounds for suspension of a producer’s certificate of eligibility, issued pursuant to Section 27200, pending adjudication of the violations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 696, Sec. 2.   (AB 2552)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Gun Show Enforcement and Security Act of 2000 [27300. - 27350.]

27300.

This article shall be known, and may be cited as, the Gun Show Enforcement and Security Act of 2000.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

27305.

All gun show or event vendors shall certify in writing to the producer that they:

(a) Will not display, possess, or offer for sale any firearms, ammunition, knives, or weapons for which possession or sale is prohibited.

(b) Will not display, possess, or offer for sale any unserialized frame or receiver, including an unfinished frame or receiver.

(c) Will not display, possess, or offer for sale any attachment or conversion kit designed to convert a handgun into a short-barreled rifle or into an assault weapon.

(d) Acknowledge that they are responsible for knowing and complying with all applicable federal, state, and local laws dealing with the possession and transfer of firearms or ammunition.

(e) Will not engage in activities that incite or encourage hate crimes.

(f) Will process all transfers of firearms through licensed firearms dealers as required by state law.

(g) Will process all sales or transfers of ammunition through licensed firearms dealers or ammunition vendors as required by state law.

(h) Will verify that all firearms in their possession at the show or event will be unloaded, and that the firearms will be secured in a manner that prevents
 them from being operated except for brief periods when the mechanical condition of a firearm is being demonstrated to a prospective buyer.

(i) Have complied with the requirements of Section 27320.

(j) Will not display or possess black powder, or offer it for sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 696, Sec. 3.   (AB 2552)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

27310.

(a) All firearm, ammunition, and firearm precursor part transfers or sales at a gun show or event shall be conducted in accordance with applicable state and federal laws.

(b) The Department of Justice may inspect
 any firearms dealers, ammunition vendors,
 firearm precursor part vendors, or manufacturers participating in a gun show or event in order to ensure compliance with subdivision (a). The department may adopt regulations to administer the application and enforcement provisions of this chapter.

(c) Commencing July 1, 2023, the department shall annually conduct enforcement and inspection of
 a minimum of one-half of all gun shows or events in the state to ensure compliance with this article and with Article 1 (commencing with Section 27200).

(d) The department shall post any violation of subdivision (a) by a firearms dealer, firearm precursor part vendor, or ammunition vendor discovered during an inspection of a gun show or event on its internet website for a period of 90 days after an inspection.

(e) (1) By no later than May 1, 2024, and annually thereafter, the department shall prepare and submit a report to the Legislature summarizing
 their enforcement efforts pursuant to this section.

(2) The report to be submitted pursuant to this subdivision shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 696, Sec. 4.   (AB 2552)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

27315.

Sales of ammunition at a gun show or event shall comply with all applicable laws, including Sections 30347, 30348, 30350, 30352, and 30360.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 736, Sec. 9.   (AB 1669)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

27320.

(a) Before commencement of a gun show or event, each vendor who will offer for sale any firearms manufactured after December 31, 1898, or any ammunition, shall provide to the producer all of the following information relative to the vendor, the vendor’s employees, and other persons, compensated or not, who will be working or otherwise providing services to the public at the vendor’s display space:

(1) The person’s complete name.

(2) The person’s driver’s license or state-issued identification card number.

(3) The person’s date of birth.

(4) The person’s certificate of eligibility number pursuant to Section 26915 or 30347 of the Penal Code.

(b) The producer shall keep the information at the onsite headquarters of the show or event for the duration of the show or event, and at the producer’s regular place of business for two weeks after the conclusion of the show or event. The producer shall make the information available upon request to any sworn peace officer for purposes of the officer’s official law enforcement duties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 736, Sec. 10.   (AB 1669)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

27325.

At any gun show or event, each vendor and each employee of a vendor shall wear a name tag indicating first and last name.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

27330.

No person at a gun show or event, other than security personnel or sworn peace officers, shall possess at the same time both a firearm and ammunition that is designed to be fired in the firearm. Vendors having those items at the show for sale or exhibition are exempt from this prohibition.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

27335.

No member of the public who is under the age of 18 years shall be admitted to, or be permitted to remain at, a gun show or event unless accompanied by a parent or legal guardian. Any member of the public who is under the age of 18 years shall be accompanied by that person’s parent, grandparent, or legal guardian while at the show or event.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

27340.

(a) Persons other than show or event security personnel, sworn peace officers, or vendors, who bring any firearm or any ammunition that is separate from a firearm onto the gun show or event premises shall sign in ink the tag or sticker that is attached to the firearm prior to being allowed admittance to the show or event, as provided for in subdivision (b) and (c).

(b) All firearms carried onto the premises of a gun show or event by members of the public shall be checked, cleared of any ammunition, secured in a manner that prevents them from being operated, and an identification tag or sticker shall be attached to the firearm, prior to the person being allowed admittance to the show.
 The identification tag or sticker shall state that all firearms transfers between private parties at the show or event shall be conducted through a licensed dealer in accordance with applicable state and federal laws. The person possessing the firearm shall complete the following information on the tag before it is attached to the firearm:

(1) The gun owner’s signature.

(2) The gun owner’s printed name.

(3) The identification number from the gun owner’s government-issued photo identification.

(c) Any ammunition carried onto the premises of a gun show or event by members of the public shall be checked and secured in a manner that prevents the ammunition from
 being discharged. An identification tag or sticker shall be attached to the ammunition prior to the person being allowed admittance to the show. The identification tag or sticker shall state that all ammunition transfers between private parties at the show or event shall be conducted through a licensed dealer or ammunition vendor in accordance with applicable state and federal laws. The person possessing the ammunition shall complete the following information on the tag before it is attached to the ammunition:

(1) The ammunition owner’s signature.

(2) The ammunition owner’s printed name.

(3) The identification number from the ammunition owner’s government-issued photo identification.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 736, Sec. 11.   (AB 1669)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

27345.

Any person who possesses a firearm or ammunition at a gun show or event shall have government-issued photo identification in immediate possession, and shall display it upon request to any security officer or peace officer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 736, Sec. 12.   (AB 1669)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

27350.

(a) Unless otherwise specified, a first violation of this article is an infraction.

(b) Any second or subsequent violation of this article is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed six months, by a fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both such fine and imprisonment. Additionally, the department shall prohibit the person from participating as a vendor at any gun show or event for a period of one year.

(c) Any person who commits an act the person knows to be a violation of this article shall, for a first offense, be punished by imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed six months, by a fine
 of two thousand dollars ($2,000), or by both such fine and imprisonment, and shall be prohibited from participating as a vendor at any gun show or event for a period of one year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 696, Sec. 5.   (AB 2552)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Exceptions Relating to Law Enforcement [27400. - 27415.]

27400.

(a) Article 1 (commencing with Section 27200) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 27300) do not apply to any sale, delivery, or transfer of firearms made to an authorized law enforcement representative of any city, county, city and county, or state, or of the federal government, for exclusive use by that governmental agency if, prior to the sale, delivery, or transfer of these firearms, written authorization from the head of the agency authorizing the transaction is presented to the person from whom the purchase, delivery, or transfer is being made.

(b) Proper written authorization is defined as verifiable written certification from the head of the agency by which the purchaser or transferee is employed, identifying the
 employee as an individual authorized to conduct the transaction, and authorizing the transaction for the exclusive use of the agency by which that person is employed.

(c) Within 10 days of the date a handgun, and commencing January 1, 2014, any firearm, is acquired by the agency, a record of the same shall be entered as an institutional weapon into the Automated Firearms System (AFS) via the California Law Enforcement Telecommunications System (CLETS) by the law enforcement or state agency. Any agency without access to AFS shall arrange with the sheriff of the county in which the agency is located to input this information via this system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 745, Sec. 23.   (AB 809)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

27405.

Article 1 (commencing with Section 27200) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 27300) do not apply to the loan of a firearm if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(a) The loan is made by an authorized law enforcement representative of a city, county, or city and county, or of the state or federal government.

(b) The loan is made to a peace officer employed by that agency and authorized to carry a firearm.

(c) The loan is made for the carrying and use of that firearm by that peace officer in the course and scope of the officer’s duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

27410.

(a) Article 1 (commencing with Section 27200) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 27300) do not apply to the sale, delivery, or transfer of a firearm by a law enforcement agency to a peace officer pursuant to Section 10334 of the Public Contract Code.

(b) Within 10 days of the date that a handgun, and commencing January 1, 2014, any firearm, is sold, delivered, or transferred pursuant to Section 10334 of the Public Contract Code to that peace officer, the name of the officer and the make, model, serial number, and other identifying characteristics of the firearm being sold, delivered, or transferred shall be entered into the Automated Firearms System (AFS) via the California Law Enforcement Telecommunications System
 (CLETS) by the law enforcement or state agency that sold, delivered, or transferred the firearm, provided, however, that if the firearm is not a handgun and does not have a serial number, identification number, or identification mark assigned to it, that fact shall be noted in AFS. Any agency without access to AFS shall arrange with the sheriff of the county in which the agency is located to input this information via this system.
